Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-4825
Terms, defined.

For purposes
of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act:

(1)
Adult means an individual who is at least eighteen years of age;

(2)
Agent means an individual:

(A) Authorized to make health care decisions
on the principal's behalf by a power of attorney for health care; or

(B)
Expressly authorized to make an anatomical gift on the principal's behalf
by any other record signed by the principal;

(3) Anatomical
gift means a donation of all or part of a human body to take effect after
the donor's death for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or
education;

(4) Decedent means a deceased individual whose body or part is or
may be the source of an anatomical gift. The term includes a stillborn infant
and, subject to restrictions imposed by law other than the Revised Uniform
Anatomical Gift Act, a fetus. The term decedent does not include a blastocyst,
embryo, or fetus that is the subject of an induced abortion;

(5)
Disinterested witness means a witness other than the spouse, child, parent,
sibling, grandchild, grandparent, or guardian of the individual who makes,
amends, revokes, or refuses to make an anatomical gift, or another adult who
exhibited special care and concern for the individual. The term does not include
a person to which an anatomical gift could pass under section 71-4834;

(6)
Document of gift means a donor card or other record used to make an anatomical
gift. The term includes a statement or symbol on a driver's license, identification
card, or donor registry;

(7) Donor means an individual whose body
or part is the subject of an anatomical gift;

(8) Donor registry
means a data base that contains records of anatomical gifts and amendments
to or revocations of anatomical gifts;

(9) Driver's license means a license or
permit issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles to operate a vehicle, whether
or not conditions are attached to the license or permit;

(10)
Eye bank means a person that is licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal
or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage,
or distribution of human eyes or portions of human eyes;

(11)
Guardian means a person appointed by a court to make decisions regarding the
support, care, education, health, or welfare of an individual. The term does
not include a guardian ad litem;

(12) Hospital means a facility licensed
as a hospital under the law of any state or a facility operated as a hospital
by the United States, a state, or a subdivision of a state;

(13)
Identification card means a state identification card issued by the Department
of Motor Vehicles;

(14) Know means to have actual knowledge;

(15) Minor means
an individual who is under eighteen years of age;

(16) Organ procurement
organization means a person designated by the Secretary of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services as an organ procurement organization;

(17)
Parent means a parent whose parental rights have not been terminated;

(18)
Part means an organ, an eye, or tissue of a human being. The term does not
include the whole body;

(19) Person means an individual, corporation,
business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision,
agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

(20)
Physician means an individual authorized to practice medicine or osteopathy
under the law of any state;

(21) Procurement organization means an eye
bank, organ procurement organization, or tissue bank;

(22) Prospective
donor means an individual who is dead or near death and has been determined
by a procurement organization to have a part that could be medically suitable
for transplantation, therapy, research, or education. The term does not include
an individual who has made a refusal;

(23) Reasonably available means able to
be contacted by a procurement organization without undue effort and willing
and able to act in a timely manner consistent with existing medical criteria
necessary for the making of an anatomical gift;

(24) Recipient
means an individual into whose body a decedent's part has been or is intended
to be transplanted;

(25) Record means information that is inscribed
on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and
is retrievable in perceivable form;

(26) Refusal means a record created under
section 71-4830 that expressly states an intent to bar other persons from
making an anatomical gift of an individual's body or part;

(27)
Sign means, with the present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

(A)
To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

(B) To attach to or logically associate
with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process;

(28)
State means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto
Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

(29) Technician
means an individual determined to be qualified to remove or process parts
by an appropriate organization that is licensed, accredited, or regulated
under federal or state law. The term includes an enucleator;

(30)
Tissue means a portion of the human body other than an organ or an eye. The
term does not include blood unless the blood is donated for the purpose of
research or education;

(31) Tissue bank means a person that is
licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law to engage in
the recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of
tissue; and

(32) Transplant hospital means a hospital that furnishes organ transplants
and other medical and surgical specialty services required for the care of
transplant patients.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 2.